Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-1,105
Sufficiency of charge of violation; sufficiency of proof.

In any indictment, information, affidavit, or complaint charging the violation of any of the provisions of the Nebraska Liquor Control Act, it shall be sufficient to charge that the accused unlawfully manufactured, sold, offered for sale, kept for sale, delivered, or otherwise unlawfully disposed of alcoholic liquor without any further or more specific description of such liquor, and proof of any kind of alcoholic liquor unlawfully manufactured, sold, offered for sale, kept for sale, delivered, or otherwise unlawfully disposed of shall be sufficient proof as to the character or kind of alcoholic liquor.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 71, p. 411;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-371;

R.S.1943, § 53-1,105;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 72.